Utah statutes.
41-1a-1303.   Driving without registration or certificate of title -- Class B or C misdemeanor.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) or Section 41-1a-211, a person may not drive or move, or an owner may not knowingly permit to be driven or moved upon any highway any vehicle of a type required to be registered in this state:

(i)  that is not properly registered or for which a certificate of title has not been issued or applied for; or

(ii)  for which the required fee has not been paid.

(b)  A violation of this Subsection (1) is a class C misdemeanor.

(2) (a) A violation of Subsection 41-1a-202(3), related to registration of vehicles after establishing residency, is a class B misdemeanor and except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), has a minimum fine of $1000.

(b)  A court may not dismiss an action brought for a violation of Subsection 41-1a-202(3) merely because the defendant has obtained the appropriate registration subsequent to violating the section. The court may, however, reduce the fine to $200 if the violator presents evidence at the time of his hearing that:

(i)  the vehicle is currently registered properly; and

(ii)  the violation has not existed for more than one year.

(3)  A court may require proof of proper motor vehicle registration as part of any sentence imposed under this section.



Amended by Chapter 56, 2002 General Session

